Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.260

Sustainable energy trust program.

(1) If economically feasible, the commission shall develop and implement a sustainable energy trust program to provide financing for qualified improvement projects. In developing the sustainable energy trust program, the commission shall establish eligibility criteria for financing that will enable it to choose eligible applicants who are likely to repay loans made or acquired by the commission and funded from the proceeds of commission bonds.

(2) The commission shall, if economically feasible:

(a) Issue bonds, as defined in RCW 43.180.020, for the purpose of financing loans for qualified energy efficiency and renewable energy improvement projects in accordance with RCW 43.180.150;

(b) Participate fully in federal and other governmental programs and take actions that are necessary and consistent with this chapter to secure to itself and the people of the state the benefits of programs to promote energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies;

(c) Contract with a certifying authority to accept applications for energy efficiency and renewable energy improvement projects, to review applications, including binding fixed price bids for the improvements, and to approve qualified improvements for financing by the commission. For solar electric systems, the certifying authority must use an application certification process similar to the investment cost recovery incentive application process provided under RCW 82.16.120. No work by a certifying authority may commence under this section until a request has been made by the commission; and

(d) Before entering into a contract with a certifying authority as defined in RCW 43.180.020(2)(b), consult with the Washington State University energy extension [extension energy] program to determine which potential improvement technologies are appropriate.

(3) No general fund resources may be expended to implement this section.

[ 2009 c 65 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2009 c 65: See note following RCW 43.180.020.